Arkansas, session 2025, SB315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 2, Chapter 1, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 4 — Farmer Protection Act

2-1-401. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Farmer
Protection Act".

2-1-402. Findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Environmental, social, and governance activists demand “zero
emissions on farm machinery” but ignore that electric heavy farm machinery
would be far larger than diesel counterparts, would require extensive
charging infrastructure on farms to meet harvesting demands, may struggle in
cold weather, and simply is not feasible for farmers in Arkansas;
(2) Farmers in Arkansas depend on the availability of financing,
and consumers depend on farmers for food;
(3) Reducing financing, restricting fertilizer usage, or forcing
farmers to purchase electric farm machinery may put farmers out of business
*CRH082*
02/26/2025 11:44:21 AM CRH082

SB315
and raise food prices for consumers; and
(4) State governments should take steps to ensure that financial
institutions do not unfairly discriminate against agriculture producers.

2-1-403. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Agriculture producer” means a natural person or company
engaged in the production of goods derived from plants or animals.
(B) "Agriculture producer" includes without limitation:
(i) The growing of crops;
(ii) Animal husbandry; and
(iii) The production of livestock or dairy products;
(2)(A) “Company” means a for-profit organization, association,
corporation, partnership, joint venture, sole proprietorship, limited
partnership, limited liability partnership, or limited liability company.
(B) "Company" includes without limitation a wholly-owned
subsidiary, majority-owned subsidiary, parent company, or affiliate of the
entity or business association;
(3) “Discriminate in the provision of financial services” means
to directly or indirectly deny or restrict services or decline to provide
full and equal enjoyment in the provision of financial services;
(4)(A) “Environmental, social, and governance commitment” means
a public or private commitment to use market position, market power,
influence, or ability to withhold or provide business or credit to eliminate,
reduce, offset, or disclose greenhouse gas emissions or achieve other
environmental standards or objectives beyond the standards or objectives
imposed by applicable laws by a:
(i) Financial institution;
(ii) Subsidiary or affiliate of a financial
institution;
(iii) Financial institution’s board of directors; or
(iv) Financial institution's officers.
(B) "Environmental, social, and governance commitment"
includes a financial institution’s decision to join an initiative or
organization that has a purpose for its signatories’ or members’ customers to
be aligned with environmental, social, or political goals;
02/26/2025 11:44:21 AM CRH082

SB315
(5) “Financial institution” means a company that:
(A) Offers financial services;
(B) Has total assets over one hundred billion dollars
($100,000,000,000), including without limitation the assets of a subsidiary
or affiliate of the company; and
(C) Has financial services that account for at least ten
percent (10%) of the company’s revenues; and
(6) “Financial services” means a product or service that is of a
financial nature, including without limitation:
(A) Banking services;
(B) Lending;
(C) Credit card or debit card services;
(D) Investment banking services;
(E) Securities brokerage or securities dealing;
(F) Investment advice;
(G) Insurance;
(H) Electronic payment services; and
(I) Money transfer services.

2-1-404. Prohibition on unlawful discrimination in agriculture
financing.
(a) A financial institution shall not discriminate in the provision of
financial services to an agriculture producer based, in whole or in part,
upon the agriculture producer’s:
(1) Greenhouse gas emissions;
(2) Use of fossil-fuel derived fertilizer; or
(3) Use of fossil-fuel powered machinery.
(b)(1) If a financial institution has made an environmental, social,
and governance commitment, there is a rebuttable presumption that the
financial institution’s denial or restriction of a financial service to an
agriculture producer violates subsection (a) of this section.
(2) Evidence of an environmental, social, and governance
commitment includes without limitation:
(A) Advertising;
(B) Public or private statements, resolutions,
explanations, reports, memoranda, or other communications; or
02/26/2025 11:44:21 AM CRH082

SB315
(C) Participation in, affiliation with, or status as a
signatory to any coalition, initiative, joint statement of principles, or
agreement, the purpose of which is to use business activity to further
environmental, social, or governance goals.
(3)(A) A financial institution may overcome the rebuttable
presumption in subdivision (b)(1) of this section by demonstrating, through
clear and convincing evidence, that its denial or restriction of a financial
service was based solely on a documented ordinary business purpose and not on
an environmental, social, and governance commitment.
(B) An ordinary business purpose used to overcome the
rebuttable presumption in subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall not
include any purpose to further environmental, social, or governance
interests.

2-1-405. Enforcement.
(a) A violation of § 2-1-404 is a violation of the Arkansas Civil
Rights Act of 1993, § 16-123-101 et seq., and the Deceptive Trade Practices
Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.
(b) The Attorney General and the Secretary of the Department of
Agriculture shall coordinate efforts to enforce this subchapter.
(c) The Attorney General may investigate and seek remedies as provided
under the Arkansas Civil Rights Act of 1993, § 16-123-101 et seq., and the
Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.
(d)(1) If the secretary has reasonable cause to believe that a
financial institution has engaged in or is engaging in a violation of this
subchapter, the secretary may:
(A) Require the financial institution to file a statement
or report in writing on forms prescribed by the secretary, under oath, as to
all the facts and circumstances concerning the violation as well as other
data and information the secretary deems necessary;
(B) Examine under oath any person in connection with the
violation; and
(C) Examine any record, book, document, account, or paper
the secretary deems necessary.
(2) In enforcing this subchapter, the secretary may:
(A) Conduct hearings;
02/26/2025 11:44:21 AM CRH082

SB315
(B) Make recommendations;
(C) Issue orders;
(D) Adopt rules;
(E) Conduct statistical studies or surveys in order to
collect data related to the existence and effect of environmental, social,
and governance commitments or environmental, social, and governance policies
that are related to agriculture;
(F) Prepare and disseminate the information gathered under
subdivision (d)(2)(E) of this section or any other information related to the
existence and impact of those environmental, social, and governance
commitments or environmental, social, and governance policies; and
(G) Assess civil penalties of up to ten thousand dollars
($10,000) per violation.
(e)(1) The secretary may refer cases to the Attorney General for
additional action, including without limitation to bring a civil action for
relief.
(2) The additional action authorized under subdivision (e)(1) of
this section may include an application for a permanent or temporary
injunction, restraining order, or other order as necessary to enforce this
subchapter.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of this
act or the application of this act to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of
this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end, the provisions of this act are declared
severable.









02/26/2025 11:44:21 AM CRH082